Massachusetts, session 194th, S2502.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6B of chapter 115 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in paragraph 3, the words “, provided, that the surviving spouse does
not remarry,”.
of 1